zh-CN: 导眼类型: 双脚; 螺旋; 微型; 滚轮; 单脚; 蛇形; 螺旋; 其他
de: Typ der Rutenringe: Zweisteg; Spiralförmig; Micro; Roller; Einsteg; Schlangen; Spiral; Sonstige
pt-PT: Tipo de guia: Dupla fixação; Helicoidal; Micro; Rolo; Fixação simples; Snake; Espiral; Outro
sk-SK: Typ vodiaceho očka: Dvojpätkové; Helikálne; Mikro; Kladkové; Jednopätkové; Hadovité; Špirálové; Iné
tr: Misina kılavuz tipi: Çift ayaklı; Helisel; Mikro; Makaralı; Tek ayaklı; Yılan şeklinde; Sarmal; Diğer
el: Τύπος οδηγού: Διπλού ποδιού; Ελικοειδής; Micro; Roller; Μονού ποδιού; Snake; Σπιράλ; Άλλο
es: Tipo de guía: Pata doble; Helicoidal; Micro; Rodillo; Pata simple; Tipo serpiente; Espiral; Otro
it: Tipo di anelli: A doppio ponte; Elicoidale; Micro; A carrucola; A ponte singolo; A serpente; A spirale; Altro
vi: Loại vòng dẫn dây: Chân kép; Xoắn ốc; Siêu nhỏ; Con lăn; Chân đơn; Rắn; Xoắn ốc; Khác
cs: Typ průvodce: Dvoupatková; Helikální; Mikro; Kladková; Jednopatková; Hadovitá; Spirálová; Ostatní
zh-TW: 導環類型: 雙腳; 螺旋; 微型; 滾輪; 單腳; 蛇型; 螺旋; 其他
nb: Guidetype: Dobbeltfot; Helisk; Mikro; Rulle; Enkeltfot; Slange; Spiral; Annet
hr-HR: Tip vodiča: Dvostruka stopa; Helikoidna; Mikro; Rolica; Jednostruka stopa; Zmijasta; Spiralna; Ostalo
hu: Vezető típusa: Kéttalpas; Spirális; Mikro; Görgős; Egytalpas; Kígyó; Spirális; Egyéb
ro-RO: Tipul de ghidaj: Cu două picioare; Elicoidal; Micro; Rolă; Cu un singur picior; Tip șarpe; Spirală; Altele
sv: Typ av linstyrning: Tvåbent; Helisk; Mikro; Rullögla; Enbent; Snakering; Spiral; Övrigt
lt-LT: Kreiptuvo tipas: Dviejų kojelių; Spiraliniai; Mikro; Su ratuku; Vienos kojelės; Gyvatėlės formos; Spiraliniai; Kita
ja: ガイドタイプ: ダブルフット; ヘリカル; マイクロ; ローラー; シングルフット; スネーク; スパイラル; その他
pt-BR: Passador tipo: Pata dupla; Helicoidal; Micro; Roldana; Pata simples; Cobra; Espiral; Outro
ko: 가이드 유형: 더블 풋; 헬리컬; 마이크로; 롤러; 싱글 풋; 스네이크; 스파이럴; 기타
fr: Type de guide: À double patte; Hélicoïdal; Micro; À poulie; À simple patte; Serpentiforme; En spirale; Autre
pl: Typ przelotki: Dwustopkowa; Helikalna; Mikro; Rolkowa; Jednostopkowa; Typu snake (wężowa); Spiralna; Inne
da: Type af lineføring: Dobbeltben; Helisk; Mikro; Rulle; Enkeltben; Slange; Spiral; Andet
en: Guide type: Double foot; Helical; Micro; Roller; Single foot; Snake; Spiral; Other
sl-SI: Vrsta vodila: Z dvema nogicama; Helikalno; Mikro; Z valjčkom; Z eno nogico; Kačaste; Spiralne; Drugo
th: ประเภทคู่มือ: ขาคู่; เกลียว; ไมโคร; ลูกกลิ้ง; ขาเดี่ยว; ทรงงู; สไปรัล; อื่นๆ
nl: Geleideoog type: Double-foot; Helicaal; Micro; Roller; Single-foot; Snake; Spiraal; Overig
fi: Renkaan tyyppi: Kaksijalkainen; Kierteinen; Mikro; Rulla; Yksijalkainen; Käärme; Spiraali; Muu
bg-BG: Тип водачи: С две крачета; Спираловиден; Микро; Ролков; С едно краче; Змиевиден; Спирален; Други
ru: Тип колец: Двухлапый; Спиралевидный; Микро; Роликовый; Однолапый; Змейка; Спиральный; Другое